hu: Teherbírás (párosítás/táblák): 1 pár síléc; 1 snowboard; 2 pár síléc; 2 snowboard; 3 pár síléc; 3 snowboard; 4 pár síléc; 4 snowboard; 5 pár síléc; 6 pár síléc; Vegyes (sílécek és snowboardok); Nem alkalmazható; Egyéb
pl: Pojemność (pary/deski): 1 para nart; 1 deska snowboardowa; 2 pary nart; 2 deski snowboardowe; 3 pary nart; 3 deski snowboardowe; 4 pary nart; 4 deski snowboardowe; 5 par nart; 6 par nart; Mieszane (narty i deski snowboardowe); Nie dotyczy; Inne
th: ความจุในการบรรทุก (คู่/แผ่น): สกี 1 คู่; สโนว์บอร์ด 1 แผ่น; สกี 2 คู่; สโนว์บอร์ด 2 แผ่น; สกี 3 คู่; สโนว์บอร์ด 3 แผ่น; สกี 4 คู่; สโนว์บอร์ด 4 แผ่น; สกี 5 คู่; สกี 6 คู่; คละแบบ (สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด); ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
ja: 積載量（ペア／ボード）: スキー板1組; スノーボード1枚; スキー板2組; スノーボード2枚; スキー板3組; スノーボード3枚; スキー板4組; スノーボード4枚; スキー板5組; スキー板6組; ミックス (スキー板とスノーボード); 該当なし; その他
es: Capacidad de carga (pares/tablas): 1 par de esquís; 1 tabla de snowboard; 2 pares de esquís; 2 tablas de snowboard; 3 pares de esquís; 3 tablas de snowboard; 4 pares de esquís; 4 tablas de snowboard; 5 pares de esquís; 6 pares de esquís; Mixto (esquís y tablas de snowboard); No aplicable; Otro
hr-HR: Nosivost (parovi/daske): 1 par skija; 1 snowboard; 2 para skija; 2 snowboarda; 3 para skija; 3 snowboarda; 4 para skija; 4 snowboarda; 5 pari skija; 6 pari skija; Miješano (skije i snowboardi); Nije primjenjivo; Ostalo
pt-PT: Capacidade de carga (pares/pranchas): 1 par de esquis; 1 snowboard; 2 pares de esquis; 2 snowboards; 3 pares de esquis; 3 snowboards; 4 pares de esquis; 4 snowboards; 5 pares de esquis; 6 pares de esquis; Misto (esquis e snowboards); Não aplicável; Outra
en: Carrying capacity (pairs/boards): 1 pair skis; 1 snowboard; 2 pairs skis; 2 snowboards; 3 pairs skis; 3 snowboards; 4 pairs skis; 4 snowboards; 5 pairs skis; 6 pairs skis; Mixed (skis and snowboards); Not applicable; Other
sv: Bärförmåga (par/brädor): 1 par skidor; 1 snowboard; 2 par skidor; 2 snowboards; 3 par skidor; 3 snowboards; 4 par skidor; 4 snowboards; 5 par skidor; 6 par skidor; Blandat (skidor och snowboards); Ej tillämpligt; Annat
zh-CN: 承载能力（副/块）: 1 副双板滑雪板; 1 块单板滑雪板; 2 副双板滑雪板; 2 块单板滑雪板; 3 副双板滑雪板; 3 块单板滑雪板; 4 副双板滑雪板; 4 块单板滑雪板; 5 副双板滑雪板; 6 副双板滑雪板; 混合（单板和双板滑雪板）; 不适用; 其他
de: Tragfähigkeit (Paare/Boards): 1 Paar Skier; 1 Snowboard; 2 Paar Skier; 2 Snowboards; 3 Paar Skier; 3 Snowboards; 4 Paar Skier; 4 Snowboards; 5 Paar Skier; 6 Paar Skier; Gemischt (Skier und Snowboards); Nicht zutreffend; Sonstige
ru: Вместимость (пар/досок): 1 пара лыж; 1 сноуборд; 2 пары лыж; 2 сноуборда; 3 пары лыж; 3 сноуборда; 4 пары лыж; 4 сноуборда; 5 пар лыж; 6 пар лыж; Смешанная (лыжи и сноуборды); Неприменимо; Другое
el: Χωρητικότητα μεταφοράς (ζευγάρια/σανίδες): 1 ζευγάρι σκι; 1 snowboard; 2 ζευγάρια σκι; 2 snowboard; 3 ζευγάρια σκι; 3 snowboard; 4 ζευγάρια σκι; 4 snowboard; 5 ζευγάρια σκι; 6 ζευγάρια σκι; Μικτό (σκι και snowboard); Δεν ισχύει; Άλλο
zh-TW: 承載容量 (對/塊): 1 雙雙板滑雪板; 1 塊單板滑雪板; 2 雙雙板滑雪板; 2 塊單板滑雪板; 3 雙雙板滑雪板; 3 塊單板滑雪板; 4 雙雙板滑雪板; 4 塊單板滑雪板; 5 雙雙板滑雪板; 6 雙雙板滑雪板; 混合 (雙板和單板滑雪板); 不適用; 其他
fr: Capacité de transport, en paires ou en planches: 1 paire de skis; 1 planche à neige; 2 paires de skis; 2 planches à neige; 3 paires de skis; 3 planches à neige; 4 paires de skis; 4 planches à neige; 5 paires de skis; 6 paires de skis; Mixte (skis et planches à neige); Non applicable; Autre
ko: 운반 용량(켤레 수/보드 수): 스키 1쌍; 스노보드 1개; 스키 2쌍; 스노보드 2개; 스키 3쌍; 스노보드 3개; 스키 4쌍; 스노보드 4개; 스키 5쌍; 스키 6쌍; 혼합(스키 및 스노보드); 해당 없음; 기타
da: Bæreevne (par/plader): 1 par ski; 1 snowboard; 2 par ski; 2 snowboards; 3 par ski; 3 snowboards; 4 par ski; 4 snowboards; 5 par ski; 6 par ski; Blandet (ski og snowboards); Ikke relevant; Andet
fi: Kantavuus (paria/lautaa): 1 suksipari; 1 lumilauta; 2 suksiparia; 2 lumilautaa; 3 suksiparia; 3 lumilautaa; 4 suksiparia; 4 lumilautaa; 5 suksiparia; 6 suksiparia; Sekalainen (suksia ja lumilautoja); Ei sovelleta; Muu
tr: Taşıma kapasitesi (çift/board): 1 çift kayak; 1 snowboard; 2 çift kayak; 2 snowboard; 3 çift kayak; 3 snowboard; 4 çift kayak; 4 snowboard; 5 çift kayak; 6 çift kayak; Karma (kayak ve snowboard); Geçerli değil; Diğer
vi: Sức chứa (cặp/ván): 1 cặp ván trượt ski; 1 ván trượt snowboard; 2 cặp ván trượt ski; 2 ván trượt snowboard; 3 cặp ván trượt ski; 3 ván trượt snowboard; 4 cặp ván trượt ski; 4 ván trượt snowboard; 5 cặp ván trượt ski; 6 cặp ván trượt ski; Hỗn hợp (ván trượt ski và snowboard); Không áp dụng; Khác
lt-LT: Talpa (poros / lentos): 1 pora slidžių; 1 snieglentė; 2 poros slidžių; 2 snieglentės; 3 poros slidžių; 3 snieglentės; 4 poros slidžių; 4 snieglentės; 5 poros slidžių; 6 poros slidžių; Mišrus (slidės ir snieglentės); Netaikoma; Kita
cs: Nosnost (lyže/snowboardy): 1 pár lyží; 1 snowboard; 2 páry lyží; 2 snowboardy; 3 páry lyží; 3 snowboardy; 4 páry lyží; 4 snowboardy; 5 párů lyží; 6 párů lyží; Kombinované (lyže a snowboardy); Nevztahuje se; Jiné
nl: Draagvermogen (paren/planken): 1 paar ski's; 1 snowboard; 2 paar ski's; 2 snowboards; 3 paar ski's; 3 snowboards; 4 paar ski's; 4 snowboards; 5 paar ski's; 6 paar ski's; Gemengd (ski's en snowboards); Niet van toepassing; Overige
sk-SK: Nosnosť (páry/dosky): 1 pár lyží; 1 snoubord; 2 páry lyží; 2 snoubordy; 3 páry lyží; 3 snoubordy; 4 páry lyží; 4 snoubordy; 5 párov lyží; 6 párov lyží; Zmiešané (lyže a snoubordy); Neuvádza sa; Iná
sl-SI: Nosilnost (pari/plošče): 1 par smuči; 1 snežna deska; 2 para smuči; 2 snežni deski; 3 pari smuči; 3 snežne deske; 4 pari smuči; 4 snežne deske; 5 parov smuči; 6 parov smuči; Mešano (smuči in snežne deske); Se ne uporablja; Drugo
bg-BG: Товароносимост (двойка/бордове): 1 чифт ски; 1 сноуборд; 2 чифта ски; 2 сноуборда; 3 чифта ски; 3 сноуборда; 4 чифта ски; 4 сноуборда; 5 чифта ски; 6 чифта ски; Смесено (ски и сноуборди); Не е приложимо; Друго
ro-RO: Capacitate de transport (perechi/plăci): 1 pereche de schiuri; 1 snowboard; 2 perechi de schiuri; 2 snowboarduri; 3 perechi de schiuri; 3 snowboarduri; 4 perechi de schiuri; 4 snowboarduri; 5 perechi de schiuri; 6 perechi de schiuri; Mixt (schiuri și snowboarduri); Nu se aplică; Altele
pt-BR: Capacidade de carga (pares/pranchas): 1 par de esquis; 1 snowboard; 2 pares de esquis; 2 snowboards; 3 pares de esquis; 3 snowboards; 4 pares de esquis; 4 snowboards; 5 pares de esquis; 6 pares de esquis; Misto (esquis e snowboards); Não aplicável; Outro
it: Capacità di carico (associato/tavole): 1 paio di sci; 1 snowboard; 2 paia di sci; 2 snowboard; 3 paia di sci; 3 snowboard; 4 paia di sci; 4 snowboard; 5 paia di sci; 6 paia di sci; Misto (sci e snowboard); Non applicabile; Altro
nb: Bæreevne (sammenkoblede/brett): 1 par ski; 1 snowboard; 2 par ski; 2 snowboard; 3 par ski; 3 snowboard; 4 par ski; 4 snowboard; 5 par ski; 6 par ski; Blandet (ski og snowboard); Ikke aktuelt; Annet